Maryland, session 2026, HB1182.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–11A–01.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Behavior intervention plan” has the meaning stated in § 7–1101 of this title.
(c) “Elopement” means the act of a student leaving the school campus without the
permission of a school staff member who has responsibility for the student.
(d) “IEP” means an individualized education program as defined under the
federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act.
(e) “Nonpublic school” has the meaning stated in § 7–1101 of this title.
(f) “School” means:
(1) A public elementary, middle, or high school;
(2) The Maryland School for the Blind;
(3) The Maryland School for the Deaf; and
(4) A nonpublic school.
(g) “School campus” means the buildings and grounds of a school, including a
playground.
(h) (1) “Wandering” means the act of a student leaving a classroom or area on
the school campus, but not leaving the school campus, without the permission of a school
staff member who has responsibility for the student.

HOUSE BILL 1182 3
(2) “Wandering” does not include a student leaving a classroom or area on
the school campus under a flash pass or another standing arrangement that has been
approved by a school administrator.
7–11A–02.
(a) Each time a student attempts or accomplishes an elopement, the school shall
notify the student’s parent or guardian of the elopement incident on the same day as the
elopement incident.
(b) At least one time each year, a school or a student’s IEP team shall review and
address with relevant stakeholders a student’s wandering or elopement behavior in
updating the student’s IEP or behavior intervention plan.
(C) A SCHOOL SHALL DEVELOP POLICIES AND PROCEDURES TO IMPLEMENT
THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.
[7–11A–03.
A school shall develop policies and procedures to implement the requirements of this
subtitle.]
7–11A–03.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “LOCATIVE DEVICE” MEANS A WEARABLE OR
PORTABLE ELECTRONIC DEVICE THAT IS CAPABLE OF LOCATING A STUDENT
DURING AN ELOPEMENT INCIDENT.
(B) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, A SCHOOL MAY
COORDINATE A STUDENT’S VOLUNTARY USE OF A LOCATIVE DEVICE AND MONITOR
THE STUDENT’S LOCATION USING THE LOCATIVE DEVICE ONLY IF:
(1) THE STUDENT HAS A DOCUMENTED HISTORY OF WANDERING OR
ELOPEMENT BEHAVIOR IN THE STUDENT’S IEP OR BEHAVIOR INTERVENTION PLAN;
AND
(2) THE STUDENT’S PARENT OR GUARDIAN PROVIDES INFORMED,
WRITTEN CONSENT TO:
(I) THE STUDENT’S VOLUNTARY USE OF THE LOCATIVE
DEVICE; AND
(II) THE SCHOOL’S MONITORING OF THE STUDENT’S LOCATION
USING THE LOCATIVE DEVICE; AND

HOUSE BILL 1182
(3) THE LOCATIVE DEVICE:
(I) IS INCAPABLE OF MAKING AUDIO OR VIDEO RECORDINGS OF
OTHER STUDENTS OR SCHOOL PERSONNEL; OR
(II) HAS FEATURES CAPABLE OF AUDIO OR VIDEO RECORDING
TURNED OFF WHEN THE STUDENT IS IN AN EDUCATIONAL SETTING.
(C) (1) A SCHOOL MAY MONITOR A STUDENT’S LOCATION USING A
LOCATIVE DEVICE UNDER THIS SECTION ONLY FOR WANDERING OR ELOPEMENT
BEHAVIOR.
(2) A SCHOOL SHALL:
(I) LIMIT INFORMATION OBTAINED THROUGH A STUDENT’S
VOLUNTARY USE OF A LOCATIVE DEVICE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION TO
INFORMATION THAT IS REASONABLY NECESSARY TO ADDRESS OR RESPOND TO A
STUDENT’S WANDERING OR ELOPEMENT BEHAVIOR; AND
(II) MAINTAIN ANY INFORMATION OBTAINED THROUGH A
STUDENT’S USE OF A LOCATIVE DEVICE IN ACCORDANCE WITH APPLICABLE
FEDERAL AND STATE EDUCATION PRIVACY LAWS.
(3) INFORMATION OBTAINED THROUGH A STUDENT’S VOLUNTARY
USE OF A LOCATIVE DEVICE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION:
(I) MAY BE ACCESSED ONLY BY:
1. PERSONNEL IDENTIFIED IN THE STUDENT’S IEP OR
BEHAVIOR INTERVENTION PLAN; AND
2. EMERGENCY RESPONSE PROVIDERS AS NECESSARY
DURING AN ELOPEMENT INCIDENT;
(II) MAY NOT BE RETAINED FOR LONGER THAN NECESSARY TO
ADDRESS OR RESPOND TO A STUDENT’S WANDERING OR ELOPEMENT BEHAVIOR OR
AS REQUIRED BY LAW; AND
(III) SHALL BE PROTECTED BY EMPLOYING REASONABLE
ADMINISTRATIVE, TECHNICAL, AND PHYSICAL SAFEGUARDS.
(D) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ISSUE ADVISORY GUIDANCE TO
SCHOOLS ON:

HOUSE BILL 1182 5
(I) INCORPORATING A STUDENT’S VOLUNTARY USE OF A
LOCATIVE DEVICE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION IN THE STUDENT’S IEP OR
BEHAVIOR INTERVENTION PLAN; AND
(II) PRIVACY AND DATA PROTECTION CONSIDERATIONS
ASSOCIATED WITH USE OF A LOCATIVE DEVICE.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT’S GUIDANCE UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL:
(I) SHALL GRANT A SCHOOL DISCRETION AS TO WHETHER AND
HOW TO IMPLEMENT A STUDENT’S VOLUNTARY USE OF A LOCATIVE DEVICE IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION; AND
(II) MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED AS LEGAL ADVICE ABOUT THE
FEDERAL ADMINISTRATION OF FEDERAL PRIVACY LAW.
(E) A SCHOOL MAY DEVELOP POLICIES AND PROCEDURES TO IMPLEMENT
THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.
(F) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION MAY BE CONSTRUED TO:
(1) REQUIRE A SCHOOL TO PROVIDE, PURCHASE, REIMBURSE,
MANAGE, OR MONITOR A LOCATIVE DEVICE OR A RELATED SERVICE PLAN; OR
(2) REQUIRE A PARENT, GUARDIAN, OR STUDENT TO PURCHASE OR
USE A LOCATIVE DEVICE, INCLUDING AS A CONDITION OF ENROLLMENT IN A SCHOOL
OR FOR THE PROVISION OF ANY SERVICE.
7–11A–04.
A SCHOOL:
(1) SUBJECT TO ITEM (2) OF THIS SECTION, SHALL DEVELOP
POLICIES AND PROCEDURES TO IMPLEMENT THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS
SUBTITLE; AND
(2) MAY DEVELOP POLICIES AND PROCEDURES TO IMPLEMENT THE
REQUIREMENTS OF § 7–11A–03 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.